Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Article 3. Electronic Voting Systems
[Repealed].

§§ 23-7-301 through 23-7-325.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 339, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§§23-7-301 through23-7-309. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3316-31 to 3316-35; Laws, 1966, ch. 609, §§ 1-51]

§23-7-311. [Codes, 1942, § 3316-36; Laws, 1966, ch. 609, § 6; Laws, 1972, ch. 512, § 2]

§§23-7-313 and23-7-315. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3316-37, 3316-38; Laws, 1966, ch. 609, §§ 7, 8]

§23-7-317. [Codes, 1942, § 3316-39; Laws, 1966, ch. 609, § 9; Laws, 1972, ch. 512, § 1]

§§23-7-319 through23-7-325. [Codes, 1942, § 3316-40 to 3316-43; Laws, 1966, ch. 609, §§ 10-13]